Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1002
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 31-1001 to 31-1023, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in sections 31-1003 to 31-1016 shall apply.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 626, § 2.